Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-194
Credential; disciplinary action; costs; how taxed.

If the order issued regarding discipline of a credential is adverse to the credential holder, the costs shall be charged to him or her as in ordinary civil actions in the district court, but if the state is the unsuccessful party, the costs shall be paid out of any money in the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund available for that purpose. Witness fees and costs may be taxed according to the rules prevailing in the district court.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 56, p. 468;

C.S.1929, § 71-611;

R.S.1943, § 71-157;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 55;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 47;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 35;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 386;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 118;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-157;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 94.